Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-35] Jurisdiction of summary
courts-martial. (a) Subject to section 124A-32, summary courts-martial
have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this chapter, except officers, for
any offense made punishable by this chapter.

(b) No person with respect to whom summary
courts-martial have jurisdiction may be brought to trial before a summary
court-martial if the person objects thereto, unless under section 124A-21 the
person has been permitted and has elected to refuse punishment under that section.
If objection to trial by summary court-martial is made by an accused who has
not been permitted to refuse punishment under section 124A-21, trial shall be
ordered by special or general court-martial, as may be appropriate.

(c) A summary court-martial may sentence to a
fine of not more than $25 for a single offense, to forfeiture of pay and
allowances, and to reduction of a noncommissioned officer to the ranks. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next